South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 30, Title 27 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 27-30-180. (A) Regardless of a restrictive covenant, declaration, rule, contractual provision, or other requirement found in a deed, contract, lease, rental agreement, or homeowners association document, a homeowner or tenant may display a political sign on the premises of the property he is entitled to use, excluding common areas accessible to all members of the community, during the period beginning thirty days before and ending five days after the date of the election to which the sign relates. (B)(1) A homeowners association may adopt and enforce rules relating to a political sign that restricts the: (a) size of the sign, provided the allowable size is at least twenty-four inches by eighteen inches regardless of orientation; (b) number of signs that may be displayed, provided the rule permits a homeowner to display at least two signs for each candidate, political party, or public question of the election to which the sign relates; (c) locations where a sign may be displayed on common areas accessible to all members of the community; and (d) placement of a political sign outside of the period beginning thirty days before and ending five days after the date of the election to which the sign relates. (2) A homeowners association may remove a sign that violates the rules permitted by this section. (C) For purposes of this section, "political sign" means a sign advocating: (1) the election or defeat of one or more candidates for nomination or election; (2) support for or opposition to a political party or a political party's candidate; and (3) the approval or disapproval of a public question. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----